Wisconsin, session 2025, AB346.
do enact as follows:AB346,1Section 1. 25.40 (1) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:25.40 (1) (a) 3. Revenues collected under ss. 341.09 (2) (d), (2m) (a) 1., (4), and (7), 341.14 (2), (2m), (6) (d), (6m) (a), (6r) (b) 2., (6w), and (8), 341.145 (3), 341.147 (3), 341.16 (1) (a) and (b), (2), (2e), and (2m), 341.17 (8), 341.19 (1), 341.25, 341.255 (1), (2) (a), (b), and (c), and (5), 341.26 (1), (2), (2m) (am) and (b), (3), (3m), (4), (5), and (7), 341.264 (1), 341.265 (1), 341.266 (2) (b) and (3), 341.268 (2) (b) and (3), 341.269 (2) (b), 341.30 (3), 341.305 (3), 341.308 (3), 341.36 (1) and (1m), 341.51 (2), and 342.14 that are pledged to any fund created under s. 84.59 (2).AB346,2Section 2. 84.59 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:84.59 (2) (b) The department may, under s. 18.562, deposit in a separate and distinct special fund outside the state treasury, in an account maintained by a trustee, revenues derived under ss. 341.09 (2) (d), (2m) (a) 1., (4), and (7), 341.14 (2), (2m), (6) (d), (6m) (a), (6r) (b) 2., (6w), and (8), 341.145 (3), 341.147 (3), 341.16 (1) (a) and (b), (2), (2e), and (2m), 341.17 (8), 341.19 (1), 341.25, 341.255 (1), (2) (a), (b), and (c), and (5), 341.26 (1), (2), (2m) (am) and (b), (3), (3m), (4), (5), and (7), 341.264 (1), 341.265 (1), 341.266 (2) (b) and (3), 341.268 (2) (b) and (3), 341.269 (2) (b), 341.30 (3), 341.305 (3), 341.308 (3), 341.36 (1) and (1m), 341.51 (2), and 342.14 and from any payments received with respect to agreements or ancillary arrangements entered into under s. 18.55 (6) with respect to revenue obligations issued under this section. The revenues deposited are the trustee’s revenues in accordance with the agreement between this state and the trustee or in accordance with the resolution pledging the revenues to the repayment of revenue obligations issued under this section. Revenue obligations issued for the purposes specified in sub. (1) and for the repayment of which revenues are deposited under this paragraph are special fund obligations, as defined in s. 18.52 (7), issued for special fund programs, as defined in s. 18.52 (8).AB346,3Section 3. 341.147 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 341.147 (1) (intro.) and amended to read:341.147 (1) (intro.) The Subject to sub. (1m), the owner of a fleet of 10 or more vehicles that are automobiles or motor trucks with a gross weight of not more than 8,000 pounds or that are a combination of any of the following may upon application register the fleet of vehicles under this section.:AB346,4Section 4. 341.147 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:341.147 (1) (a) Motor trucks with a gross weight of not less than 8,001 pounds nor more than 54,000 pounds.AB346,5Section 5. 341.147 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:341.147 (1) (b) Truck tractors or road tractors with a gross weight of not less than 4,500 pounds nor more than 54,000 pounds.AB346,6Section 6. 341.147 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:341.147 (1) (c) Trailers with a gross weight of not more than 80,000 pounds.AB346,7Section 7. 341.147 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:341.147 (1m) No vehicle registered under s. 341.264, 341.30, or 341.305 or that may be registered under s. 341.26 may be registered under this section.AB346,8Section 8. 341.147 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:341.147 (2) Upon receipt of an application and the initial registration fees, the department shall issue registration plates of a distinctive design with the word “Fleet” embossed displayed on the plate for all of the vehicles in the fleet. Notwithstanding s. 341.13 (1), the department may not require the placement of an annual registration decal on a registration plate under this subsection. The department shall provide, to the extent feasible, the same registration expiration date for each vehicle in a fleet. A vehicle may be registered as part of a fleet under this section regardless of whether, at the time of application for the initial registration of the fleet, the vehicle is currently registered with the department.AB346,8LSection 8L. 341.15 (1m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:341.15 (1m) (a) Except as provided in par. pars. (b) or (c) to (d), any registration decal or tag issued by the department shall be placed on the rear registration plate of the vehicle in the manner directed by the department.AB346,8nSection 8n. 341.15 (1m) (d) of the statutes is created to read:341.15 (1m) (d) If the department issues 2 decals to indicate the registered weight class of a vehicle, the decals shall be displayed on the registration plates attached to the front and rear of the vehicle in the manner directed by the department.AB346,9Section 9. 341.25 (1) (gd) of the statutes is amended to read:341.25 (1) (gd) For each trailer or semitrailer having a gross weight of 3,000 pounds or less and used for hire or rental, a fee which is one-half of the fee prescribed for a motor truck of the same maximum gross weight. The maximum gross weight shall be determined in the same manner as for a motor truck. A trailer under this paragraph which is part of a fleet of 100 or more trailers used for hire or rental may be registered under s. 341.308.AB346,10Section 10. 341.25 (1) (ge) of the statutes is amended to read:341.25 (1) (ge) For each trailer or semitrailer having a gross weight of more than 3,000 pounds but not more than 12,000 pounds designed to be hauled by a motor vehicle other than a truck tractor and not coming within the provisions of s. 341.264, a fee which is one-half of the fee prescribed for a motor truck of the same maximum gross weight. The maximum gross weight shall be determined in the same manner as for a motor truck. A trailer under this paragraph having a gross weight of 4,500 pounds or less and used for hire or rental and which is part of a fleet of 100 or more trailers used for hire or rental may be registered under s. 341.308.AB346,11Section 11. 341.308 of the statutes is repealed.AB346,12Section 12. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 10th month beginning after publication. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab346 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab346 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB346 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB346 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB346: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting